Tennessee, session 114, HB0850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 3, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), an official who is employed or
contracted by the federal government, the state government, or a local government
within this state, or an agency or department thereof, including a peace officer,
inspector, and wildlife official, shall, prior to entering private property to conduct a
search, obtain a search warrant, as described in § 40-6-106, that identifies the person or
property that is the subject of the search.
(b) An official is not required to obtain a search warrant pursuant to subsection
(a) if a judicially recognized exception to the warrant requirement exists at the time of the
search.
(c) An official who knowingly fails to obtain a search warrant when a search
warrant is required by this section commits a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0850
002596
- 1 -